Washington statutes.
RCW 41.04.385

Child care—Legislative findings—State policy—Responsibilities of director of enterprise services.

The legislature finds that (1) demographic, economic, and social trends underlie a critical and increasing demand for child care in the state of Washington; (2) working parents and their children benefit when the employees' child care needs have been resolved; (3) the state of Washington should serve as a model employer by creating a supportive atmosphere, to the extent feasible, in which its employees may meet their child care needs; and (4) the state of Washington should encourage the development of partnerships between state agencies, state employees, state employee labor organizations, and private employers to expand the availability of affordable quality child care. The legislature finds further that resolving employee child care concerns not only benefits the employees and their children, but may benefit the employer by reducing absenteeism, increasing employee productivity, improving morale, and enhancing the employer's position in recruiting and retaining employees. Therefore, the legislature declares that it is the policy of the state of Washington to assist state employees by creating a supportive atmosphere in which they may meet their child care needs. Policies and procedures for state agencies to address employee child care needs will be the responsibility of the director of enterprise services in consultation with the secretary of the department of children, youth, and families and state employee representatives.

[ 2018 c 58 s 21; 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 433; 2006 c 265 s 201; 2005 c 490 s 9; 2002 c 354 s 236; 1993 c 194 s 5; 1986 c 135 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2018 c 58: See note following RCW 28A.655.080.

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.

Effective date—2006 c 265: See RCW 43.216.902.

Effective date—2005 c 490: See note following RCW 43.216.705.

Short title—Headings, captions not law—Severability—Effective dates—2002 c 354: See RCW 41.80.907 through 41.80.910.